Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-106
Active addiction, defined.

Active addiction means current physical or psychological dependence on alcohol or a substance, which dependence develops following the use of alcohol or a substance on a periodic or continuing basis.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 6.